src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON NAERRI
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
      CRi ;
      SRi ;


!! # Intermediate adjectival lexica
! ==============================

LEXICON adj_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Der/heit:heit kv2 ;
  a_non_umlaut ; ! For the non-umlauted forms
  a_umlaut     ; ! for the umlauted forms

LEXICON a_non_umlaut
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  a_m_sg_n         ;
  a_non_umlaut_obl ;

LEXICON a_non_umlaut_obl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  a_m_sg_a ;
  a_m_sg_g ;

  a_m_pl_n ;
  a_m_pl_a ;
  a_m_pl_g ;

  a_f_sg_a ;
  a_f_sg_d ; 
  a_f_sg_g ;

  a_f_pl_n ;
  a_f_pl_a ;
  a_f_pl_d ;
  a_f_pl_g ;

  a_n_sg_n ;
  a_n_sg_a ;

  a_n_sg_g ;
  a_n_pl_g ;

LEXICON a_umlaut
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  a_m_sg_d ;
  a_m_pl_d ;

  a_f_sg_n ;

  a_n_sg_d ;
  a_n_pl_n ;
  a_n_pl_a ;
  a_n_pl_d ;


!LEXICON adj_r_gen
!  a_m_pl_g_ra  ;
!  a_f_sg_g_rar ;
!  a_f_pl_g_ra  ;
!  a_n_pl_g_ra  ;

!! Adjectival case lexica
! ======================


! Indefinite declension
! _____________________

LEXICON Sg_Msc1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Msc1_Uuml
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Msc2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc1 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc1_Uuml 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc2 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc2_Uuml 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;

LEXICON msgpl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>an # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:^EPH%>ir # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>ar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a  # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc3 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>nir # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>nar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na  # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem1_Uuml
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem2_Uuml
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem1 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem1_Uuml 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem2 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;
 
LEXICON Pl_Fem2_Uuml 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;
 
LEXICON fsgpl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>a   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:^EPH%>ar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>ar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem3 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>nar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>nar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu1 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu1_Uuml 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu2 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu3 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu3_Uuml 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Neu1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Neu1_Uuml
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%> 	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Neu2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ara	 # ;
 
LEXICON Pl_Neu2_Uuml
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%> 	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ara	 # ;
 
LEXICON nsgpl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a	 # ;
 
!LEXICON nsgpld
! +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ð	 # ;
! +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ð	 # ;
! +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um	 # ;
! +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
! +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
! +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
! +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um	 # ;
! +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a	 # ;
 

!! Msc

LEXICON a_m_sg_n
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_n_null
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_d
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_g
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_n
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_d
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_g
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;

!LEXICON a_m_pl_g_ra
! +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra # ;


! Fem

LEXICON a_f_sg_n
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML # ;
 
LEXICON a_f_sg_n_null
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_d
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_g
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;

!LEXICON a_f_sg_g_rar
! +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_n
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_d
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_g
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;

!LEXICON a_f_pl_g_ra
! +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra # ;


!! Neu

LEXICON a_n_sg_n
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t # ;
              +Adv:%>t # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_d
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_g
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_n
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%> # ;
